Washington statutes.
RCW 38.32.010

Nonmilitary offenses by members on-duty status.

Any member of the organized militia committing nonmilitary offenses under chapter 38.38 RCW while on-duty status or within state armories shall be promptly arrested by the military authorities and turned over to the civil authorities of the county or city in which the offense was committed.

[ 2009 c 378 s 1; 1989 c 19 s 39; 1963 c 220 s 134; 1943 c 130 s 82; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-82.]